North Carolina statutes. Chapter 35A. Incompetency and Guardianship.
Article 11. Public Guardians.

§ 35A-1270.
Appointment; term; oath.

There may be in every county a public guardian, to be appointed by the clerk for a term of eight years. The public guardian shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation faithfully and honestly to discharge the duties imposed upon him; the oath or affirmation so taken and subscribed shall be filed in the office of the clerk.

History.

1987, c. 550, s. 1.

§ 35A-1271.
Bond of public guardian; increasing bond.

The public guardian shall enter into bond with three or more sureties, approved by the clerk in the penal sum of six thousand dollars ($6,000), payable to the State of North Carolina, conditioned faithfully to perform the duties of his office and obey all lawful orders of the superior or other courts touching said guardianship of all wards, money or estate that may come into his hands. Whenever the aggregate value of the real and personal estate belonging to his several wards exceeds one-half the bond herein required the clerk shall require him to enlarge his bond in amount so as to cover at least double the aggregate amount under his control as guardian.

History.

1987, c. 550, s. 1.

§ 35A-1272.
Powers, duties, liabilities, compensation.

The powers and duties of said public guardian shall be the same as other guardians, and he shall be subject to the same liabilities as other guardians under the existing laws, and shall receive the same compensation as other guardians.

History.

1987, c. 550, s. 1.

§ 35A-1273.
When letters issue to public guardian.

The public guardian shall apply for and obtain letters of guardianship in the following cases:

When a period of six months has elapsed from the discovery of any property belonging to any minor or incompetent person without guardian.

When any person entitled to letters of guardianship shall request in writing the clerk to issue letters to the public guardian; but it is lawful and the duty of the clerk to revoke said letters of guardianship at any time after issuing the same upon application in writing by any person entitled to qualify as guardian, setting forth a sufficient cause for such revocation.

History.

1987, c. 550, s. 1.

§§ 35A-1274 through 35A-1279.

Reserved for future codification purposes.